finnish.xfst
clear stack

!define stems as words from finnish_stems.txt
read text finnish_stems.txt
define stem

!helpful patterns
define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|I] ;
define Consonant [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z] ;
define largeStem [ ? ? ? ? (%I) ];

!define combinations of stems + tags
define num  [%+Sg:0 | %+Pl: {I} ];
define case [%+Nom:0 | %+Part:{ta}];
define word stem num case;

!transformation rules
define rule1 [{uo} ->o, {ie} -> e || _I  ];

define rule2 [{aa} -> a, {ee} -> e, {ii} -> i, {oo} -> o, {uu} -> u  || _I] ;

define rule3 [a -> 0 || [u|o]_I];

define rule4 [a -> o, i -> e || _I];

define rule5 [{ta} -> a ||largeStem  _[.#.] ];

define rule6 [I -> j || Vowel_Vowel] ;

define rule7 [I -> i];



!compose rules into one
define morphparser word .o. rule1 .o. rule2 .o. rule3 .o. rule4 .o. rule5 .o. rule6 .o. rule7;




push morphparser
